Maryland, session 2025, HB0562.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
4–203.
(c) (1) In Baltimore County, the Republican Party Central Committee shall
consist of [four] THREE members elected from each councilmanic district in the county.
(2) For the Baltimore County Democratic Party Central Committee:
(i) [20] 10 members, [five] TWO from each district, shall be elected
from legislative districts [6, 8, 10, and 11] 11A, 42A, 42B, 43B, AND 44A, each district
being located wholly [within] IN Baltimore County;
(ii) [four] 12 members, FOUR FROM EACH DISTRICT, shall be
elected from legislative [district 44B that is] DISTRICTS 7A, 11B, AND 44B, EACH
DISTRICT BEING located wholly in Baltimore County; AND
(iii) [four] 18 members, SIX FROM EACH DISTRICT, shall be elected
from [that part of] legislative [district 7 that is] DISTRICTS 6, 8, AND 10, EACH DISTRICT
BEING located WHOLLY in Baltimore County[;
– 1 –

Ch. 413 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) four members shall be elected from that part of legislative
district 12 that is located in Baltimore County; and
(v) five members, of which two members shall be from delegate
district 42A and three members shall be from delegate district 42B, shall be elected from
legislative district 42 that is located wholly in Baltimore County].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –